Washington statutes.
RCW 26.44.185

Investigation of child sexual abuse—Revision and expansion of protocols—Child fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect cases.

(1) Each county shall revise and expand its existing child sexual abuse investigation protocol to address investigations of child fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect cases and to incorporate the statewide guidelines for first responders to child fatalities developed by the criminal justice training commission. The protocols shall address the coordination of child fatality, child physical abuse, and criminal child neglect investigations between the county and city prosecutor's offices, law enforcement, children's protective services, children's advocacy centers, where available, local advocacy groups, emergency medical services, and any other local agency involved in the investigation of such cases. The protocol shall include the handling of child forensic interview audio and video recordings in accordance with RCW 26.44.186. The protocol revision and expansion shall be developed by the prosecuting attorney in collaboration with the agencies referenced in this section.

(2) Revised and expanded protocols under this section shall be adopted and in place by July 1, 2008. Thereafter, the protocols shall be reviewed every two years to determine whether modifications are needed.

[ 2018 c 171 s 5; 2010 c 176 s 3; 2007 c 410 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2018 c 171: See note following RCW 26.44.188.

Short title—2007 c 410: See note following RCW 13.34.138.